Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8894. HEMPHILL COUNTY UNDERGROUND WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8894.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Hemphill County Underground Water Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8894.0002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district in Hemphill County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8894.0003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8894.0004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district's boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of Hemphill County, unless the district's territory has been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J or K, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8894.0051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8894.0052. ELECTION DATE. The district shall hold an election to elect the appropriate number of directors on the uniform election date in May of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8894.0101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. Except as otherwise provided by Section 8894.0102, the district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8894.0102. NO EMINENT DOMAIN POWER. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2021.